New Jersey, session 221, A2922.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Credit card means a card, plate or other single credit device that may be used from time to time to obtain credit. Merchandise means any objects, wares, merchandise, commodities, services, or anything offered directly or indirectly to consumers for sale or rental at retail. Retail mercantile establishment means any place of business where merchandise is offered at retail to consumers. Surcharge means any additional amount imposed by a retail mercantile establishment at the time of a sales transaction that increases a charge to a consumer for the use of a credit card. 2.    a.  It shall be an unlawful practice and a violation of P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.) for a retail mercantile establishment to impose a surcharge on a consumer who uses a credit card instead of cash, check, or any similar means of payment. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section, a retail motor fuel dealer may sell similar fuels at different prices to cash and credit customers, provided that neither price is below the net cost of the fuel to the retail dealer plus all selling expenses, as provided in section 201 of P.L.1938, c.163 (C.56:6-2), including, in the case of credit sales, the cost to the dealer of providing credit sales. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.